Florida, session 2026, SB592.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âSubsection (136) is added to section 320.08058, 13 Florida Statutes, to read: 14 320.08058âSpecialty license plates.â 15 (136)âMIAMI CAROL CITY SENIOR HIGH SCHOOL ALUMNI LICENSE 16 PLATES.â 17 (a)âThe department shall develop a Miami Carol City Senior 18 High School Alumni license plate as provided in this section and 19 s. 320.08053. The plate must bear the colors and design approved 20 by the department. The word âFloridaâ must appear at the top of 21 the plate, and the words âMiami Carol City Senior High School 22 Alumniâ must appear at the bottom of the plate. 23 (b)âThe annual use fees from the sale of the plate must be 24 distributed to the Chief Hall Association, Inc., which may use 25 up to 10 percent of the fees for administrative costs and 26 marketing of the plate. The balance of the fees must be used by 27 the Chief Hall Association, Inc., to fund academic programs, 28 athletic programs, extracurricular activities, and auxiliary 29 programs for, and programs designed to incentivize the 30 achievement of, students attending Miami Carol City Senior High 31 School. 32 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.